dictionaries/kk_KZ/kk_KZ.aff
SFX X N 52
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]му
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]су
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX X у айық [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX X у ейік [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX X у йік [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX X у йық [аоуұыэ]у
SFX X ю йеік [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX X ю йаық [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX x N 51
SFX x бу п [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX x бу п [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX x гу к [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX x ғу қ [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX x гу к [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX x ғу қ [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX x ду т [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX x ду т [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]му
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]су
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]у
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX x у [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX x у [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX x ю й [аоуұыэәеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX Y N 52
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX Y у іңдер [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX Y у ңдар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX Y у ңдер [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]му
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]су
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX Y у ыңдар [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX Y ю йіңдер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX Y ю йыңдар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX y N 52
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX y у іңіз [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX y у ңіз [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX y у ңыз [аоуұыэ]у
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]му
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]су
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX y у ыңыз [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX y ю йіңіз [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX y ю йыңыз [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX Z N 52
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX Z у іңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX Z у ңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX Z у ңыздар [аоуұыэ]у
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]му
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]су
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX Z у ыңыздар [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX Z ю йіңіздер [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX Z ю йыңыздар [аоуұыэ]ю
SFX z N 52
SFX z бу псін [әеёиөүіюя]бу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ву
SFX z гу ксін [әеёиөүіюя]гу
SFX z ғу қсін [әеёиөүіюя]ғу
SFX z ду тсін [әеёиөүіюя]ду
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]жу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]зу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ку
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]қу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]лу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]му
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ну
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ңу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]һу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]пу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ру
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]су
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ту
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]у
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]фу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]ху
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]цу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]чу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]шу
SFX z у сін [әеёиөүіюя]щу
SFX z бу псын [аоуұыэ]бу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ву
SFX z гу ксын [аоуұыэ]гу
SFX z ғу қсын [аоуұыэ]ғу
SFX z ду тсын [аоуұыэ]ду
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]жу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]зу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ку
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]қу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]лу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]му
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ну
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ңу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]һу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]пу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ру
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]су
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ту
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]у
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]фу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]ху
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]цу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]чу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]шу
SFX z у сын [аоуұыэ]щу
SFX z ю йсін [әеёиөүіюя]ю
SFX z ю йсын [аоуұыэ]ю
